Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1.2. Utilization Review Standards and Appeals.

§ 32.1-137.7.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Adverse determination”
means a determination by the managed care health insurance plan or its designee utilization review entity that, based upon information provided, a request for a benefit upon application of any utilization review technique does not meet the managed care health insurance plan’s requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care, or effectiveness or is determined to be experimental or investigational and the requested benefit is therefore denied, reduced, or terminated or payment is not provided or made, in whole or in part, for the benefit. When the policy, contract, plan, certificate, or evidence of coverage includes coverage for prescription drugs and the health service rendered or proposed to be rendered is a prescription for the alleviation of cancer pain, any adverse determination shall be made within 24 hours of the request for coverage.

“Commission”
means the Virginia State Corporation Commission.

“Covered person”
means a subscriber, policyholder, member, enrollee or dependent, as the case may be, under a policy or contract issued or issued for delivery in Virginia by a managed care health insurance plan licensee, insurer, health services plan, or preferred provider organization.

“Evidence of coverage”
includes any certificate, individual or group agreement or contract, or identification card or related documents issued in conjunction with the certificate, agreement or contract, issued to a subscriber setting out the coverage and other rights to which a covered person is entitled.

“Final adverse determination”
means an adverse determination involving a covered benefit that has been upheld by a managed care health insurance plan, or its designee utilization review entity, at the completion of the managed care health insurance plan’s internal appeal process.

“Medical director”
means a physician licensed to practice medicine in the Commonwealth of Virginia who is an employee of a utilization review entity responsible for compliance with the provisions of this article.

“Peer of the treating health care provider”
means a physician or other health care professional who holds a nonrestricted license in the Commonwealth of Virginia or under a comparable licensing law of a state of the United States and in the same or similar specialty as typically manages the medical condition, procedure or treatment under review.

“Physician advisor”
means a physician licensed to practice medicine in the Commonwealth of Virginia or under a comparable licensing law of a state of the United States who provides medical advice or information to a private review agent or a utilization review entity in connection with its utilization review activities.

“Private review agent”
means a person or entity performing utilization reviews, except that the term shall not include the following entities or employees of any such entity so long as they conduct utilization reviews solely for subscribers, policyholders, members or enrollees:

A health maintenance organization authorized to transact business in Virginia; or

A health insurer, hospital service corporation, health services plan or preferred provider organization authorized to offer health benefits in this Commonwealth.

“Treating health care provider”
or

“provider”

means a licensed health care provider who renders or proposes to render health care services to a covered person.

“Utilization review”
means a system for reviewing the necessity, appropriateness and efficiency of hospital, medical or other health care services rendered or proposed to be rendered to a patient or group of patients for the purpose of determining whether such services should be covered or provided by an insurer, health services plan, managed care health insurance plan licensee, or other entity or person. For purposes of this article, “utilization review” shall include, but not be limited to, preadmission, concurrent and retrospective medical necessity determination, and review related to the appropriateness of the site at which services were or are to be delivered. “Utilization review” shall not include (i) any review of issues concerning insurance contract coverage or contractual restrictions on facilities to be used for the provision of services, (ii) any review of patient information by an employee of or consultant to any licensed hospital for patients of such hospital, or (iii) any determination by an insurer as to the reasonableness and necessity of services for the treatment and care of an injury suffered by an insured for which reimbursement is claimed under a contract of insurance covering any classes of insurance defined in §§

38.2-117

,

38.2-118

,

38.2-119

,

38.2-124

,

38.2-125

,

38.2-126

,

38.2-130

,

38.2-131

,

38.2-132

, and

38.2-134

.

“Utilization review entity”
or

“entity”

means a person or entity performing utilization review.

“Utilization review plan”
or

“plan”

means a written procedure for performing review.

History.

1998, cc. 129, 891; 1999, c. 857; 2000, c. 564; 2011, c. 788.

Cross references.

As to health and related insurance for state employees, see §

2.2-2818

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 751, cl. 3, repealed Acts 2011, c. 788, cl. 3, which would have made amendments by Acts 2011, c. 788, expire on July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 788, substituted the definition of “Adverse determination” for “ ‘Adverse decision’ means a utilization review determination by the utilization review entity that a health service rendered or proposed to be rendered was or is not medically necessary, when such determination may result in noncoverage of the health service or health services. When the policy, contract, plan, certificate, or evidence of coverage includes coverage for prescription drugs and the health service rendered or proposed to be rendered is a prescription for the alleviation of cancer pain, any adverse decision shall be made within twenty-four hours of the request for coverage”; substituted the definition of “Final adverse determination” for “ ‘Final adverse decision’ means a utilization review determination made by a physician advisor or peer of the treating health care provider in a reconsideration of an adverse decision, and upon which a provider or patient may base an appeal”; substituted “utilization review entity” for “utilization review organization” in the definition of “Medical director”; and substituted “§§

38.2-117

,

38.2-118

,

38.2-119

,

38.2-124

,

38.2-125

,

38.2-126

,

38.2-130

,

38.2-131

,

38.2-132

, and

38.2-134

” for “§§

38.2-117

through

38.2-119

,

38.2-124

through

38.2-126

,

38.2-130

through

38.2-132

, and

38.2-134

” at the end of the definition of “Utilization review.” See Editor’s note.

§ 32.1-137.8.
Application to and compliance by utilization review entities.

No utilization review entity shall perform utilization review with regard to hospital, medical or other health care resources rendered or proposed to be rendered to a covered person except in accordance with the requirements and standards set forth in this article.

This article shall not apply to utilization review performed under contract with the federal government for utilization review of patients eligible for hospital services under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act or under contract with a plan otherwise exempt from operation of this chapter pursuant to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.

This article shall not apply to private review agents subject to Article 2.1 (§

32.1-138.6

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 32.1 of the Code of Virginia.

This article shall not apply to programs administered by the Department of Medical Assistance Services or under contract with the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

History.

1998, cc. 129, 891.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Code Commission, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1998, c. 129, which amended former § 38.2-5401. In accordance with c. 129, the amendment, in subsection C, substituted “Article 2.1 (§

32.1-138.6

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 32.1” for “Chapter 53 (§

38.2-5300

et seq.) of this title.”

§ 32.1-137.9.
Requirements and standards for utilization review entities.

Each entity shall establish reasonable and prudent standards and criteria to be applied in utilization review determinations with input from physician advisors representing major areas of specialty and certified by the boards of the various American medical specialties. Such standards shall be objective, clinically valid, and compatible with established principles of health care. Such standards shall further be established so as to be sufficiently flexible to allow deviations from norms when justified on case-by-case bases.The entity shall make available to any provider or covered person, upon written request, a list of such physician advisors and their major areas of specialty, as well as the standards and criteria established in accordance with this section except as prohibited in accordance with copyright laws.

An adverse determination shall be made only in accordance with §

32.1-137.13

.

Each entity shall have a process for reconsideration of an adverse determination in accordance with §

32.1-137.14

and an appeals process in accordance with §

32.1-137.15

.

Each entity shall make arrangements to use the services of physician advisors who are specialists in the various categories of health care on “per need” or “as needed” bases in conducting utilization review.

Each entity shall have review staff who are properly qualified, trained and supervised, and supported by a physician advisor, to carry out its review determinations.

Each entity shall notify its covered persons of the review process, including the appeals process, and shall so notify the covered person’s provider upon written request by the provider. An Evidence of Coverage shall contain a clear and complete statement, if a contract, or a reasonably complete summary, if a certificate, of the process for reconsideration of an adverse determination rendered under §

32.1-137.13

, as required by §

32.1-137.14

, and the process for internal appeal from an adverse determination under §

32.1-137.15

.

Each entity shall communicate its utilization review decision no later than two business days after receipt by the entity of all information necessary to complete the review.

Each entity shall have a representative, authorized to approve utilization review determinations, available to covered persons and providers in accordance with §

32.1-137.11

.

The Commissioner shall have the right to determine that an entity has complied with the requirement that the entity establish reasonable and prudent requirements and standards pursuant to this section.

History.

1998, c. 891; 2011, c. 788.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 751, cl. 3, repealed Acts 2011, c. 788, cl. 3, which would have made amendments by Acts 2011, c. 788, expire on July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 788, substituted “adverse determination” for “adverse decision” throughout the section, and substituted “internal appeal from an adverserve determination under §

32.1-137.15

” for “appeal from a final adverse decision under §

32.1-137.15

” at the end of subsection F. See Editor’s note.

§ 32.1-137.10.
Utilization review plan required.

Each utilization review entity subject to this article shall adopt a utilization review plan that contains procedures for complying with the requirements and standards of §

32.1-137.9

and other applicable provisions of this article. Such plan shall contain, at a minimum, the following:

Specific procedures to be used in review determinations, including an expedited review of no more than twenty-four hours for review determinations relating to prescriptions for the alleviation of cancer pain;

A provision for advance notice to covered persons of any requirements for certification of the health care setting or pre-approval of the necessity of health care service or any other prerequisites to approval of payment;

A provision for advance notice to covered persons that compliance with the review process is not a guarantee of benefits or payment under the health benefit plan;

A provision for a process for reconsideration of adverse decisions in accordance with §

32.1-137.14

and an appeals process in accordance with §

32.1-137.15

; and

Policies and procedures designed to ensure confidentiality of patient-specific medical records and information in accordance with subsection C of §

32.1-137.12

.

Each utilization review entity subject to this chapter shall make available to providers and covered persons, upon written request, a copy of those portions of its utilization review plan relevant to the specific request.

The Commissioner shall have the right to determine that an entity has complied with the requirement that the entity adopt a utilization review plan in accordance with subsection A.

History.

1998, c. 891; 1999, c. 857.

§ 32.1-137.11.
Accessibility of utilization review entity.

A utilization review entity shall provide accessibility for covered persons and providers by free telephone at least forty hours per week during normal business hours. Entities located outside of the eastern time zone shall provide covered persons advance written notification of the eastern time zone hours during which those entities are accessible; however, such hours shall be no less than forty hours per week during normal business hours. The entity shall install and maintain an adequate telephone system that accepts and records messages or accepts and provides recorded business hour information for incoming calls outside of normal business hours.

History.

1998, c. 891.

§ 32.1-137.12.
Emergencies; extensions; access to and confidentiality of patient-specific medical records and information.

For emergency health care, authorization may be requested by the covered person, his representative, or his provider either within forty-eight hours of or by the end of the first business day following the rendering of the emergency health care, whichever is later.

An entity shall promptly review a request from the covered person, his representative, or his provider for an extension of the original approved duration of health care or hospitalization. If the entity fails to confirm that termination of health care or hospitalization will occur on the original date authorized, the entity shall review retrospectively whether the extension of health care or hospitalization was medically appropriate.

Each entity shall have reasonable access to patient-specific medical records and information.

History.

1998, c. 891.

§ 32.1-137.13.
Adverse determination.

The treating provider shall be notified in writing of any adverse determination within two working days of the determination; however, the treating provider shall be notified orally by telephone within 24 hours of any adverse determination for a prescription known to be for the alleviation of cancer pain. Any such notification shall include instructions for the provider on behalf of the covered person to (i) seek a reconsideration of the adverse determination pursuant to §

32.1-137.14

, including the contact name, address, and telephone number of the person responsible for making the adverse determination, and (ii) seek an appeal of the adverse determination pursuant to §

32.1-137.15

, including the contact name, address, and telephone number to file and perfect such appeal.

No entity shall render an adverse determination unless it has made a good faith attempt to obtain information from the provider. At any time before the entity renders its determination, the provider shall be entitled to review the issue of medical necessity with a physician advisor or peer of the treating health care provider who represents the entity. For any adverse determination relating to a prescription to alleviate cancer pain, a physician advisor shall review the issue of medical necessity with the provider.

History.

1998, c. 891; 1999, c. 857; 2001, c. 22; 2010, c. 395; 2011, c. 788.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 751, cl. 3, repealed Acts 2011, c. 788, cl. 3, which would have made amendments by Acts 2011, c. 788, expire on July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 788, and substituted “adverse determination” for “adverse decision” throughout the section. See Editor’s note.

§ 32.1-137.14.
Reconsideration of adverse determination.

A treating provider may request reconsideration of an adverse determination pursuant to this section or may appeal an adverse determination pursuant to §

32.1-137.15

. Any reconsideration of an adverse determination shall only be requested by the treating provider on behalf of the covered person. A determination on reconsideration shall be made by a physician advisor, peer of the treating health care provider, or a panel of other appropriate health care providers with at least one physician advisor or peer of the treating health care provider on the panel.

The treating provider on behalf of the covered person shall be (i) notified verbally at the time of the determination of the reconsideration of the adverse determination and in writing following the determination of the reconsideration of the adverse determination, in accordance with §

32.1-137.9

, including the criteria used and the clinical reason for the adverse determination and the alternate length of treatment of the alternate treatment setting or settings, if any, that the entity deems to be appropriate, and (ii) notified verbally at the time of the determination of the reconsideration of the adverse determination of the process for an appeal of the determination pursuant to §

32.1-137.15

and the contact name, address, and telephone number to file and perfect an appeal. If the treating provider on behalf of the covered person requests that the adverse determination be reviewed by a peer of the treating provider at any time during the reconsideration process, the request for reconsideration shall be vacated and considered an appeal pursuant to §

32.1-137.15

. In such cases, the covered person shall be notified that the reconsideration has been vacated and an appeal initiated, all documentation and information provided or relied upon during the reconsideration process pursuant to this section shall be converted to the appeal process, and no additional actions shall be required of the treating provider to perfect the appeal.

Any reconsideration shall be rendered and the determination provided to the treating provider and the covered person in writing within 10 working days of receipt of the request for reconsideration.

History.

1998, c. 891; 2010, c. 395; 2011, c. 788.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 751, cl. 3, repealed Acts 2011, c. 788, cl. 3, which would have made amendments by Acts 2011, c. 788, expire on July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 788, substituted “adverse determination” for “adverse decision” throughout the section. See Editor’s note.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Appeals involving cases of retrospective utilization review denials. —

Health care providers have no authority to appeal, on their own behalf, final adverse decisions involving cases of retrospective utilization review denials. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John H. Chichester, Member, Senate of Virginia, 00-033 (6/9/00).

§ 32.1-137.15.
Adverse determination; appeal.

Each entity shall establish an internal appeals process, including a process for urgent care appeals, to consider any adverse determination that is appealed by a covered person, his representative, or his provider in accordance with the provisions of §

38.2-3558

.

History.

1998, c. 891; 1999, cc. 643, 649, 857; 2000, c. 922; 2010, c. 395; 2011, c. 788.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 751, cl. 3, repealed Acts 2011, c. 788, cl. 3, which would have made amendments by Acts 2011, c. 788, expire on July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 788, rewrote the section. See Editor’s note.

§ 32.1-137.16.
Records.

Every entity subject to Article 1.1 (§

32.1-137.1

et seq.) of Chapter 5 and this article shall maintain or cause to be maintained, in writing and at a location accessible to employees of the Department, records of review procedures; the health care qualifications of the entity’s staff; the criteria used by the entity to make its determinations; records of complaints received, including the manner in which the complaints were resolved; the number and type of adverse determinations and reconsiderations; the number and outcome of final adverse determinations and appeals thereof, including a separate record for expedited appeals; and procedures to ensure confidentiality of medical records and personal information. Records of complaints under Article 1.1 (§

32.1-137.1

et seq.) shall be maintained from the date of the entity’s last examination and for no less than six years.

Every entity subject to utilization review under this article shall provide, upon request of the Commissioner, data and records pertaining to utilization review from which patient and provider identifiers have been removed. Records shall be maintained or caused to be maintained by the utilization review entity for a period of six years, and all such records shall be subject to examination by the Commissioner or his designee.

History.

1998, c. 891; 2011, c. 788.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 751, cl. 3, repealed Acts 2011, c. 788, cl. 3, which would have made amendments by Acts 2011, c. 788, expire on July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 788, and substituted “adverse determinations” for “adverse decisions” throughout the section, substituted “no less than six years” for “no less than five years” at the end of the first paragraph, substituted “a period of six years” for “a period of five years” in the second sentence of the second paragraph, and made minor stylistic changes. See Editor’s note.

§ 32.1-137.17.
Limitation on Commissioner’s jurisdiction.

The Commissioner shall have the right to determine compliance with this article; however, the Commissioner shall have no jurisdiction to adjudicate individual controversies arising out of or incidental to this article.

History.

1998, c. 891.